Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 229. Bail and Recognizances
§ 7554d.
Electronic Monitoring Pilot Program.

The Windham County Sheriff’s Office (WCSO) shall establish and manage a two-year electronic monitoring pilot program in Windham County for the purpose of supervising persons ordered to be under electronic monitoring as a condition of release or in addition to or in lieu of the imposition of bail pursuant to section 7554 of this title. The program shall be a part of an integrated community incarceration program and shall provide 24-hours-a-day, seven-days-a-week electronic monitoring with supervision and immediate response.
(a) (1) The Windham County Sheriff’s Office (WCSO) shall establish and manage a two-year electronic monitoring pilot program in Windham County for the purpose of supervising persons ordered to be under electronic monitoring as a condition of release or in addition to or in lieu of the imposition of bail pursuant to section 7554 of this title. The program shall be a part of an integrated community incarceration program and shall provide 24-hours-a-day, seven-days-a-week electronic monitoring with supervision and immediate response.

For purposes of this program, if electronic monitoring is ordered by the court pursuant to section 7554 of this title, the court shall use the following criteria for determining whether electronic monitoring is appropriate:

the nature of the offense with which the defendant is charged;

the defendant’s prior convictions, history of violence, medical and mental health needs, history of supervision, and risk of flight; and

any risk or undue burden to other persons who reside at the proposed residence or risk to third parties or to public safety that may result from the placement.

The WCSO shall establish written policies and procedures for the electronic monitoring program, shall provide progress reports on the development of the policies and procedures to the Justice Oversight Committee, and shall submit the final policies and procedures to the Committee for approval on or before June 30, 2016.

The goal of the pilot program is to assist policymakers in determining whether electronically monitored home detention and home confinement can be utilized for pretrial detention and as a post-adjudication option to reduce recidivism, to improve public safety, and to save valuable bed space for detainees and inmates who, without an electronic monitoring program, would otherwise be lodged in a correctional facility. Additional benefits may include reducing transportation costs, increasing detainee access to services, reducing case resolution time, and determining if the program can be replicated statewide.

The WCSO shall work with the Crime Research Group (CRG) for design and evaluation assistance. The program shall be evaluated by CRG to determine if the stated goals have been attained, the cost and savings of the program, identifying what goals or objective were not met and if not, what could be changed to meet the goals and objectives to ensure program success. The Joint Fiscal Office shall contract with the CRG to provide design and evaluation services.

The purpose of expanding the electronic monitoring program to other counties under this subsection is to increase the number of participants to a level sufficient to permit evaluation of whether the program is meeting the bed savings and other goals identified in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) (2) The purpose of expanding the electronic monitoring program to other counties under this subsection is to increase the number of participants to a level sufficient to permit evaluation of whether the program is meeting the bed savings and other goals identified in subsection (b) of this section.

(1)

The WCSO is authorized to enter into written agreements with the sheriffs of other counties permitting those counties to participate in the pilot program subject to the policies and procedures established by the WCSO under this section. At least one of the agreements shall be between the WCSO and a county with a significant population.

The Department of Corrections shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs for oversight and funding of the electronic monitoring program established by this section. The memorandum shall establish processes for:

transmitting funding for the electronic monitoring program from the Department of Corrections to the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs for purposes of allocation to the sheriff’s departments participating in the program; and

maintaining oversight of the electronic monitoring program to ensure that it complies with the requirements of this section and the policies and procedures established by the WCSO pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

The pilot program shall be in effect from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2018.

HISTORY:

Added 2013, No. 179 (Adj. Sess.), § E.339.1; amended 2015, No. 125 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 23, 2016.

Particular cases.

Given its finding that home detention would be inappropriate, the trial court properly denied electronic monitoring. State v. Ford, 2015 VT 127, 200 Vt. 650, 130 A.3d 862, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 103 (2015).

§ 7555.
Repealed.
1967, No. 337 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 7555a.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds:

During the 1991-2 and the 1993-4 sessions, the General Assembly adopted Proposal 7, which proposed to amend section 40 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution to allow a judge to order a person charged with a felony involving an act of violence to be held without bail when the evidence of guilt is great and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence

that the person’s release poses a substantial threat of physical violence to any person; and

that no condition of release will reasonably prevent the physical violence.

On November 8, 1994, the voters of the State of Vermont approved Proposal 7.

On December 13, 1994, the Governor certified the amendment thereby making it effective on that date.

As amended, section 40 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution provides that if a judge orders a person held without bail, that person is entitled to a review de novo by a single Justice of the Supreme Court forthwith.

Given the unique nature of the trial court hearing which can result in the accused being denied bail, in passing Proposal 7, and its enabling legislation, H.589, the General Assembly intended to provide the accused with a second evidentiary hearing by a single Justice without regard to the record compiled before the trial court. However, in the case of State v. Madison, No. 95-046 (1995), the Vermont Supreme Court held that the term “review de novo” as it is used in section 40 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution and in H.589 does not require the single Justice to conduct a second evidentiary hearing and that the Legislature should have used the term “hearing de novo” if it intended a second, independent evidentiary hearing.

Proposal 7 substantially increased the court’s authority prior to trial and conviction to incarcerate persons accused of certain offenses. It was the intent of the General Assembly to balance this increased judicial authority with increased due process for the accused person. That increased due process was intended to be in the form of a new and independent evidentiary hearing.

In certain respects, the Vermont Constitution is not a grant of power to the Legislature, but is a limitation on its general powers. Section 40(2) of Chapter II establishes the minimum required due process for an accused, but the General Assembly may require greater due process.

It was the clear and unequivocal intent of the General Assembly that a person who is denied bail and is incarcerated prior to trial under the authority of section 40(2) of Chapter II be entitled to a second full evidentiary hearing by a single Justice.

In order to implement the intent of the General Assembly, subsection 7556(d) of this title is amended to make it clear and unequivocal that a person who is denied bail under the authority of section 40(2) of Chapter II is entitled to a second full evidentiary hearing by a single Justice. Such a hearing is intended to be in addition to but not in conflict with the constitutionally required minimum due process established by Proposal 7.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 170 (Adj. Sess.), § 24a, eff. May 15, 1996.

§ 7556.
Appeal from conditions of release.

A person who is detained, or whose release on a condition requiring him or her to return to custody after specified hours is continued, after review of his or her application pursuant to subsection 7554(d) or (e) of this title by a judicial officer, other than a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which he or she is charged or a Justice of the Supreme Court, may move the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which he or she is charged to amend the order. The motion shall be determined promptly.

When a person is detained after a court denies a motion under subsection (a) of this section or when conditions of release have been imposed or amended by the judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged, an appeal may be taken to a single Justice of the Supreme Court who may hear the matter or at his or her discretion refer it to the entire Supreme Court for hearing. No further appeal may lie from the ruling of a single Justice in matters to which this subsection applies. Any order so appealed shall be affirmed if it is supported by the proceedings below. If the order is not supported, the Supreme Court or single Justice hearing the matter may remand the case for a further hearing or may, with or without additional evidence, order the person released. The appeal shall be determined forthwith.

When a person is released, with or without bail or other conditions of release, an appeal may be taken by the State to a single Justice of the Supreme Court who may hear the matter or at his or her discretion refer it to the entire Supreme Court for hearing. No further appeal may lie from the ruling of a single Justice in matters to which this subsection applies. Any order so appealed shall be affirmed if it is supported by the proceedings below. If the order is not supported, the Supreme Court or single Justice hearing the matter may remand the case for a further hearing or may, with or without additional evidence, modify or vacate the order. The appeal shall be determined forthwith.

A person held without bail under section 7553a of this title prior to trial shall be entitled to an independent, second evidentiary hearing on the merits of the denial of bail, which shall be a hearing de novo by a single Justice of the Supreme Court forthwith. Pursuant to 4 V.S.A. § 22 the Chief Justice may appoint and assign a retired justice or judge with his or her consent or a Superior judge or District judge to a special assignment on the Supreme Court to conduct that de novo hearing. Such hearing de novo shall be an entirely new evidentiary hearing without regard to the record compiled before the trial court; except, the parties may stipulate to the admission of portions of the trial court record.

A person held without bail prior to trial shall be entitled to review of that determination by a panel of three Supreme Court Justices within seven business days after bail is denied.

HISTORY:

Added 1967, No. 337 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended 1977, No. 235 (Adj. Sess.), § 7; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 14; 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; 1995, No. 170 (Adj. Sess.), § 24b, eff. May 15, 1996; 2017, No. 11, § 31.

§ 7557.
Bail upon postponement of trial.

When a District or Superior court postpones the trial of a criminal case or the examination of a person charged with a criminal offense, the court may impose the least restrictive conditions or combination of conditions permitted under subdivision 7554(a)(1) of this title which will reasonably assure the person’s appearance before the court on the day to which the trial or examination is postponed.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. April 9, 1974; 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7558.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 7559.
Release; designation; sanctions.

The officer in charge of a facility under the control of the department of corrections, county jail or a local lockup shall discharge any person held by him or her upon receipt of an order for release issued by a judicial officer pursuant to section 7554 of this title, accompanied by the full amount of any bond or cash bail fixed by the judicial officer. The officer in charge, or a person designated by the Court Administrator, shall issue a receipt for such bond or cash bail, and shall account for and turn over such bond or cash bail to the court having jurisdiction.

The Court Administrator shall designate persons to set bail for any person under arrest prior to arraignment when the offense charged provides for a penalty of less than two years imprisonment or a fine of less than $1,000.00 or both. Such persons designated by the Court Administrator shall be considered judicial officers for the purposes of sections 7554 and 7556 of this title.

Any person who is designated by the Court Administrator under subsection (b) of this section, may refuse the designation by so notifying the Court Administrator in writing within seven days of the designation.

A person who has been released pursuant to section 7554 of this title with or without bail on condition that he or she appear at a specified time and place in connection with a prosecution for an offense and who without just cause fails to appear shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

The State’s Attorney may commence a prosecution for criminal contempt under Rule 42 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure against a person who violates a condition of release imposed under section 7554 of this title. The maximum penalty that may be imposed under this subsection shall be a fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for six months, or both. Upon commencement of a prosecution for criminal contempt, the court shall review, in accordance with section 7554 of this title, and may continue or modify conditions of release or terminate release of the person.

Notwithstanding Rule 3 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure, a law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe the person without just cause has failed to appear at a specified time and place in connection with a prosecution for an offense or has violated a condition of release relating to a restriction on travel or a condition of release that he or she not directly contact, harass, or cause to be harassed a victim or potential witness.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 99; 1973, No. 118, § 21, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1971, No. 99; 1973, No. 118, § 21, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 60, eff. April 9, 1974; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1987, No. 102, § 3.

§ 7560.
Repealed. 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7560a.
Failure to appear; forfeiture of bond; proceedings.

If a person who has been released on a secured or unsecured appearance bond or a surety bond fails to appear in court as required:

The court may:

issue a warrant for the arrest of the person; and

upon hearing and notice thereof to the bailor or surety, forfeit any bail posted on the person.

The State’s Attorney may file a motion to forfeit the amount of the bond against the surety in the Civil or Criminal Division of the Superior Court where the bond was executed.
(2) (A) The State’s Attorney may file a motion to forfeit the amount of the bond against the surety in the Civil or Criminal Division of the Superior Court where the bond was executed.

A motion filed under this subdivision shall:

include a copy of the bond;

state the facts upon which the motion is based; and

be served upon the surety.

The surety may respond to a motion to forfeit a bond. Responses must be served within 14 days of service of the motion.

Upon notice to the parties, the court shall schedule a hearing on a motion to forfeit a bond. The court shall order the surety to produce the principal at the hearing.

If the court finds that the surety has violated the terms of the bond by failing to produce the principal at the hearing or at any other court appearance at which the principal was required to appear, the court shall grant the motion to forfeit the bond. The court may, on motion, or on its own motion, adjust the amount of the forfeiture and order the forfeiture of all or part of the bond amount to the State.

If a surety fails to comply with a forfeiture order issued under subsection (d) of this section, the Attorney General may commence proceedings to enforce the order and collect the forfeited amount.

No bond may be forfeited, in whole or in part, for violation of any condition of release other than a condition that the principal appear in court as required.

Service and filing under this section shall be pursuant to Rule 49 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(g) (1) Service and filing under this section shall be pursuant to Rule 49 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure.

Computation of time under this section shall be pursuant to Rule 45 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 5, 2002; amended 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 119; 2017, No. 11, § 32.

§ 7561.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 7562.
Relief of bail—warrant to arrest and commit.

If a surety or a person who has posted bail wishes to surrender the principal in discharge of the person’s obligations under the bond or bail agreement, the person may apply in writing to a judicial officer, as defined in subsection 7554(f) of this title, for a warrant to apprehend and detain the principal. The court shall, absent good cause shown, thereupon issue such warrant, and on detention of the principal, the person’s obligation under the bond or bail agreement shall be discharged.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7563.
Execution of warrant; expenses.

On receipt of a warrant issued under section 7562 of this title with respect to a person charged with a criminal offense, and tender of fees provided for by law, an officer shall apprehend and detain the defendant, and leave with the officer in charge of the facility a copy of the warrant, with his or her return thereon. The expense of arrest and transport of the defendant to the facility shall be paid by the person applying for the warrant.

On receipt of a warrant issued under section 7562 of this title with respect to a witness in a criminal prosecution, and tender of fees provided for by law, an officer shall apprehend the witness and deliver him or her to the court for disposition.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7564.
Fees.

Fees for the arrest and detention shall be the same as for the service of other process. If there is dispute about the amount of fees, it shall be submitted to the court which issued the warrant, and its decision shall be final.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 5, 2002.

§§ 7565-7569.
Repealed. 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7570.
Power of court to return forfeited security.

A surety may file a motion requesting the return of forfeited bail, bond or any other security at any time after the order of forfeiture is entered. The court shall set the motion for hearing and provide notice thereof to the surety and the state’s attorney. If the court finds the interests of justice would be served by returning all or part of the security, the court may grant the motion and return as much of the security as it deems equitable under the circumstances.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 5, 2002.

§§ 7571,
7572.
Repealed. 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7573.
Peace bonds.

The Criminal Division of the Superior Court may order a person who is arrested for a criminal offense to find sureties that he or she will keep the peace, when it is necessary, and may order the person detained until he or she complies. The Court Administrator shall establish a form for peace bonds that includes notification that the surety has the right to be released from the obligations under the bond upon written application to the judicial officer and detention of the defendant.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. April 9, 1974; 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 5, 2002; 2009, No. 154, § 238.

§ 7574.
Release in cases after conviction.

Upon an adjudication of guilt, the trial judge shall review the terms and conditions of release and may terminate them or may continue or alter them pending sentence or pending notice of appeal or the expiration of the time allowed for filing notice of appeal.
In making such review, the judge shall consider the factors set forth in subsection 7554(b) of this title, as well as the defendant’s conduct during the trial and the fact of conviction.
Any denial of or change in the terms of release shall be reviewable in the manner provided in sections 7554 and 7556 of this title for pretrial release.

HISTORY:

Added 1987, No. 102, § 4.

Law Reviews —

For article, “An Examination of the ‘Exceptional Reasons’ Jurisprudence of the Mandatory Detention Act: Title 18 U.S.C. §§ 3143, 3145(c)”, see 19 Vt. L. Rev. 19 (1994).

§ 7575.
Revocation of the right to bail.

The right to bail may be revoked entirely if the judicial officer finds that the accused has:

intimidated or harassed a victim, potential witness, juror, or judicial officer in violation of a condition of release; or

repeatedly violated conditions of release in a manner that impedes the prosecution of the accused; or

violated a condition or conditions of release that constitute a threat to the integrity of the judicial system; or

without just cause, failed to appear at a specified time and place ordered by a judicial officer; or

in violation of a condition of release, been charged with a felony or a crime against a person or an offense similar to the underlying charge, for which, after hearing, probable cause is found.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 293 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2017, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 7576.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Appearance bond” means a written agreement that allows a person charged with a criminal offense to be released if the person pledges to pay the court a specified amount in the event the person fails to appear at a court proceeding.

“Bail” means any security, including cash, pledged to the court to ensure that a person charged with a criminal offense will appear at future court proceedings.

“Clinical assessment” means the procedures, to be conducted after a client has been screened, by which a licensed or otherwise approved counselor identifies and evaluates an individual’s strengths, weaknesses, problems, and needs for the development of a treatment plan.

“Needs screening” means a preliminary systematic procedure to evaluate the likelihood that an individual has a substance abuse or a mental health condition.

“Risk assessment” means a pretrial assessment that is designed to be predictive of a person’s failure to appear in court and risk of violating pretrial conditions of release with a new alleged offense.

“Secured appearance bond” means a written agreement which allows a person charged with a criminal offense to be released if:

the person pledges to pay the court a specified amount in the event that the person fails to appear at a court proceeding; and

a portion of the bond is paid to the court prior to release.

“Surety” means:

a person who agrees to be responsible for guaranteeing the appearance in court of a person charged with a criminal offense; or

a person who agrees to be responsible for guaranteeing that another person complies with the conditions of a peace bond under section 7573 of this title.

“Surety bond” means a written agreement, in a form established by the Court Administrator, under which a surety guarantees the appearance in court of a person charged with a criminal offense, and pledges to pay the court a specified amount if the person fails to appear.

“Flight from prosecution” means any action or behavior undertaken by a person charged with a criminal offense to avoid court proceedings.

HISTORY:

Added 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 5, 2002; amended 2015, No. 12, § 1, eff. May 1, 2015; 2017, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.